src/scripts/smn-sme-lemma.xfscript
! File to make smn into quasi-sme

! to compile
! xfst -f smn-sme-lemma.xfscript

! to use:
! cat list | lookup smnsme.fst



define Vow  [ a | e | o | u | ä | á | â | y | i ] ;
define VowNotI  [ a | e | o | u | ä | á | â | y ] ;
define Cns  [ b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l 
             | m | n | p | r | s | t | v | č | đ 
             | ŋ | š | ž ] ;

define Sgm  [ Vow | Cns ] ;

define initp  p -> b  || [.#.|h|â] _  ;
define initt  t -> d  || [.#.|m|â] _  ;
define initk  k -> g  || [.#.|m|t|h|â] _  ;

define Rulednnn n n -> d n    || Vow _ Vow ;
define Rulevn   v n -> v d n  || Vow _ Vow ;
define Rulelm   l m -> l b m  || Vow _ Vow ;
define Ruleim   i m -> i b m  || Vow _ Vow ;
define Rulerm   r m -> r b m  || Vow _ Vow ;
define Rulerv   r v -> r v v  || Vow _ Vow Cns ;
define Rulemm   m m -> p m    || Vow _ Vow ;
define Rulehch  h č -> k č    || Vow _ Vow ;
define Rulehk   h k -> r k    || Vow _ Vow ;
define Rulest   š t -> i t    || .#. Cns* [Vow - â] _ Vow (Cns) .#. ;
define Rulesk   š k -> i k    || Vow _ Vow ;
define Rulept   p t -> k t    || Vow _ Vow ;
define Ruleps   p s -> k s    || Vow _ Vow ;

define hppttkk   p p -> h p p ,
                 t t -> h t t ,
                 k k -> h k k ,
                 c c -> h c c ,
                 č č -> h č č 
                 || Vow _ Vow  ;

define RKK r k k -> r k , r t t -> r t , r p p -> r p ,
           l k k -> l k , l t t -> l t , l p p -> l p 
           || Vow _ Vow ;

define aVow [ ä -> á , â -> a ] ;

define uaVow  u á -> o a ;
define iaVow  i [ä|e] -> e a ;
define yeVow  y e -> u o ;

define finalt [ b | đ | g | p | d | h ] -> t || _ .#. ;

define finalum   u m -> o n || _ .#. ;
define finalm    m -> n  || _ .#. ;
define finale    e -> i || _ .#. ;

define aaVow       [ a a | á á ] -> á ;
define aeaeVow       ä ä -> á ;
define eeVow     e e -> e a  || .#. Cns*  _ ;
define ooVow       o o -> o ;
define uuVow       u u -> u ;

define reducedA â -> a ;

define sufvuota v u o t a -> v u o h t a  || Vow Cns Sgm* _ .#. ;
define sufiiv   i i v -> i i v a 		  || Vow Cns Sgm* _ .#. ;
define sufiik   i i k -> i h k k a 		  || Vow Cns Sgm* _ .#. ;
define sufent   e n t -> e a n t a 		  || Vow Cns Sgm* _ .#. ;
define sufttit   h t t i t	 -> h i t	  || Vow Cns Sgm* _ .#. ;

define clusters d t -> t t ;                

               

read regex [ 
initp
.o. initt
.o. initk    
.o. Rulednnn  ! n n -> d n    || Vow _ Vow ;
.o. Rulevn    ! v n -> v d n  || Vow _ Vow ;
.o. Rulelm    ! l m -> l b m  || Vow _ Vow ;
.o. Ruleim     ! i m -> i b m  || Vow _ Vow ;
.o. Rulerm    ! r m -> r b m  || Vow _ Vow ;
.o. Rulerv
.o. Rulemm    ! m m -> p m    || Vow _ Vow ;
.o. Rulehch   ! h č -> k č    || Vow _ Vow ;
.o. Rulehk    ! h k -> r k    || Vow _ Vow ;
.o. Rulest    ! š t -> i t    || Vow _ Vow ;
.o. Rulesk    ! š k -> i k    || Vow _ Vow ;
.o. Rulept    ! p t -> k t    || Vow _ Vow ;
.o. Ruleps    ! p s -> k s    || Vow _ Vow ;
.o. hppttkk
.o. RKK
.o. uaVow
.o. iaVow
.o. yeVow
.o. aVow
.o. finalt
.o. finalum
.o. finalm
.o. finale
.o. aaVow
.o. aeaeVow
.o. eeVow
.o. ooVow
.o. uuVow
.o. reducedA
.o. sufvuota   ! v u o t a -> v u o h t a  || Vow Cns Sgm* _ .#. ;
.o. sufiiv     ! i i v -> i i v a 		  || Vow Cns Sgm* _ .#. ;
.o. sufiik     ! i i k -> i h k k a 		  || Vow Cns Sgm* _ .#. ;
.o. sufent     ! e n t -> e a n t a 		  || Vow Cns Sgm* _ .#. ;
.o. sufttit    !  h t t i t	 -> h i t	  || Vow Cns Sgm* _ .#. ;
.o. clusters
] ;

invert net ;


save stack smnsme.fst
